Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3254.02
Improvement project; bonds; issued; when.

When a project which would not result in the provision of revenue-producing continuing services has been completed, the district shall have the power to issue its negotiable bonds entitled improvement project area bonds for the purpose of paying the cost of the special benefit portion of the project. Such bonds shall be payable from money in the sinking fund established in section 2-3254.05, and be issued under the conditions in section 2-3254.07.

Laws 1981, LB 388, § 3.